Utah statutes.
31A-8-214.   Securities.

Chapter 5, Part 3, Securities of Domestic Insurance Corporations, applies to securities of organizations, except that the amount "$150,000" in Subsection 31A-5-304(1) shall be read "one-half of the minimum capital required of the organization."



Amended by Chapter 90, 2004 General Session

